Utah statutes.
17D-3-201.   Commission authority to approve the creation, consolidation, division, and dissolution of conservation districts -- Notice and hearing requirements.

(1)  As provided in this part, the commission may:

(a)  pursuant to a petition under Section 17D-3-202, approve the creation of a conservation district; or

(b)  pursuant to a petition under Section 17D-3-202 or on its own motion, approve:

(i)  the consolidation of two or more existing conservation districts;

(ii)  the division of an existing conservation district into two or more conservation districts; or

(iii)  the dissolution of an existing conservation district.

(2)  Before taking an action authorized under Subsection (1), the commission shall:

(a)  cause notice of a hearing on the proposed creation, consolidation, division, or dissolution to be published:

(i)  no more than 30 days after, as the case may be:

(A)  the filing of a petition under Section 17D-3-202, for a proposed creation, consolidation, division, or dissolution; or

(B)  adoption of the commission's own motion, for a proposed consolidation, division, or dissolution; and

(ii)  within:

(A)  for a proposed creation, the area of the proposed conservation district;

(B)  for a proposed consolidation, the area of each conservation district proposed to be consolidated; and

(C)  for a proposed division or dissolution, within the area of the conservation district proposed to be divided or dissolved; and

(b)  hold a public hearing on the desirability and necessity of the creation, consolidation, division, or dissolution.

